Massachusetts, session 194th, S1142.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as amended by Chapter 150 of the Acts of 2024, is
hereby further amended in Section 17 by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
The court, in its discretion, may require a plaintiff in an action under this section
appealing a decision to approve a special permit, variance or site plan to post a surety or cash
bond in an amount of not more than $50,000 to secure the payment of costs if the court finds that
the harm to the defendant or to the public interest resulting from delays caused by the appeal
outweighs the financial burden of the surety or cash bond on the plaintiffs. The court shall
consider the relative merits of the appeal and the relative financial means of the plaintiff and the
defendant.
of 1